Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.215

Provisions applicable to plan 1.

RCW 41.32.240 through * 41.32.575 shall apply only to members of plan 1.

[ 1992 c 72 s 5; 1991 c 35 s 103.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 41.32.575 was repealed by 1995 c 345 s 11.

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.